Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1109
Clerk; reporter; State Court Administrator; duties; expenses of court; rules and regulations.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall serve as the clerk of the Court of Appeals. The Reporter of Decisions shall serve as the reporter of the Court of Appeals. The State Court Administrator shall provide facilities, supplies, equipment, and support staff needed by the Court of Appeals. All expenses of the Court of Appeals shall be included in the budget of the Supreme Court. The Supreme Court shall adopt and promulgate rules to implement sections 24-1101 to 24-1109.

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 271, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB799, § 6.